District of Columbia statutes.
34-1553

Energy submetering and energy allocation equipment.

(a)

Energy submetering equipment or energy allocation equipment may be used in a building if it is authorized in the rental agreement or lease for the nonresidential rental unit. All energy submetering equipment and energy allocation equipment shall meet the requirements and standards established and enforced by the Commission pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

(1)

If energy submetering equipment or energy allocation equipment is used in any building, the building owner, operator, or manager shall bill the tenant for electricity or natural gas for the same billing period as the utility, the electricity supplier, or the natural gas supplier serving the building, unless the rental agreement or lease expressly provides otherwise.

(2)

A late payment charge shall not be imposed on all amounts, including deferred payment installments, paid by the due date or on amounts in dispute before the Commission. Amounts paid after the due date shall bear a late payment charge of 1%, and an additional late payment charge at the rate of 11/2% on the remaining unpaid balance per billing month thereafter.

(c)

Energy allocation equipment shall be tested periodically under Commission rules by the building owner, operator, or manager. Upon the request by a tenant, the building owner, operator, or manager shall test the energy allocation equipment without charge. The test shall be conducted without charge to the tenant and shall not be conducted more frequently than once in a 24-month period for the same tenant. The tenant or his designated representative may be present during the testing of the energy allocation equipment. A written report of the results of the test shall be made to the tenant within 10 business days after the completion of the test.

(d)

A building owner, operator, or manager shall maintain adequate records regarding energy submetering equipment or energy allocation equipment. A tenant may inspect and copy the records for the nonresidential unit during reasonable business hours at a convenient location within the building. The building owner, operator, or manager may impose and collect a reasonable charge for copying documents, reflecting the actual costs of materials and labor for copying, prior to providing copies of the records to the tenant.

(e)

Notwithstanding any enforcement action undertaken by the Commission pursuant to its authority under § 34-1552, tenants and owners, operators, or managers shall retain any private right of action resulting from any breach of the rental agreement or lease terms required by this section or § 34-1552.

History

Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-250, § 703, 55 DCR 9225

Section References

This section is referenced in § 34-1552.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 703 of Clean and Affordable Energy Emergency Act of 2008 (D.C. Act 17-508, September 25, 2008, 55 DCR 10856).